Washington statutes.
RCW 41.34.140

Liability for loss or deficiencies—Limitations.

(1) A state board or commission, agency, or any officer, employee, or member thereof is not liable for any loss or deficiency resulting from member defined contribution investments selected, made, or required pursuant to RCW 41.34.060 (1), (2), or (4).

(2) Neither the department, nor director or any employee, nor the state investment board, nor any officer, employee, or member thereof is liable for any loss or deficiency resulting from a member investment in the default option pursuant to RCW 41.34.060(1) or reasonable efforts to implement investment directions pursuant to RCW 41.34.060 (1), (2), or (4).

(3) The state investment board, or any officer, employee, or member thereof is not liable with respect to any declared monthly unit valuations or crediting of rates of return, or any other exercise of powers or duties, including discretion, under RCW 41.34.060(3).

(4) The department, or any officer or employee thereof, is not liable for crediting rates of return which are consistent with the state investment board's declaration of unit valuations pursuant to RCW 41.34.060(3).

[ 2020 c 160 s 3; 2011 c 80 s 3; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 35; 1999 c 265 s 2; 1998 c 341 s 308.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2020 c 160: See note following RCW 41.34.060.

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.

Effective date—1998 c 341: See note following RCW 41.34.060.